src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VerbRoot
tyventtyyt+V:tyventy v2_odd_UUt ;
hapanttuut+V:hapantu v2_odd_UUt ;
nokkainttuut+V:nokkaintu v2_odd_UUt ;
oornaanttuut+V:oornaantu v2_odd_UUt ;
laskeuttuut+V:laskeutu v2_odd_UUt ;
vahvistuut+V:vahvistu v2_odd_UUt ;
halveksuut+V:halveksu v2_odd_UUt ;
sotkeenttuut+V:sotkeentu v2_odd_UUt ;
surmaanttuut+V:surmaantu v2_odd_UUt ;
lujenttuut+V:lujentu v2_odd_UUt ;
sekkaanttuut+V:sekkaantu v2_odd_UUt ;
hieraanttuut+V:hieraantu v2_odd_UUt ;
erkkanttuut+V:erkkantu v2_odd_UUt ;
pillanttuut+V:pillantu v2_odd_UUt ;
koventtuut+V:koventu v2_odd_UUt ;
likkainttuut+V:likkaintu v2_odd_UUt ;
piinaanttuut+V:piinaantu v2_odd_UUt ;
tassaanttuut+V:tassaantu v2_odd_UUt ;
hauttoonttuut+V:hauttoontu v2_odd_UUt ;
puneerttuut+V:puneertu v2_odd_UUt ;
vihastuut+V:vihastu v2_odd_UUt ;
rikastuut+V:rikastu v2_odd_UUt ;
kompastuut+V:kompastu v2_odd_UUt ;
triivastuut+V:triivastu v2_odd_UUt ;
kallistuut+V:kallistu v2_odd_UUt ;
epäonnistuut+V:epä#onnistu v2_odd_UUt ;
puhđistuut+V:puhđistu v2_odd_UUt ;
pakattuut+V:pakatt2u v2_odd_UUt ;
harmistuut+V:harmistu v2_odd_UUt ;
innostuut+V:innostu v2_odd_UUt ;
vaihettuut+V:vaihettu v2_odd_UUt ;
punettuut+V:punett2u v2_odd_UUt ;
kivettyyt+V:kivetty v2_odd_UUt ;
paiskauttuut+V:paiskautu v2_odd_UUt ;
ulelttuut+V:uleltu v2_odd_UUt ;
hivelttyyt+V:hivelty v2_odd_UUt ;
lissäänttyyt+V:lissäänty v2_odd_UUt ;
ilmestyyt+V:ilmesty v2_odd_UUt ;
tyrmistyyt+V:tyrmisty v2_odd_UUt ;
pelästyyt+V:pelästy v2_odd_UUt ;
lämmittyyt+V:lämmitty v2_odd_UUt ;
kehitellä+V:kehittel v3_ele ;
pölhäätellä+V:pölhäättel v3_ele ;
heilutella+V:heiluttel v3_ele ;
kojetella+V:kojettel v3_ele ;
mainitella+V:mainittel v3_ele ;
lasketella+V:laskettel v3_ele ;
ponnistella+V:ponnistel v3_ele ;
rouđatella+V:rouđattel v3_ele ;
tallustella+V:tallustel v3_ele ;
synnytellä+V:synnyttel v3_ele ;
välitellä+V:välittel v3_ele ;
kannatella+V:kannattel v3_ele ;
lakiskella+V:lakiskel v3_ele ;
ratkiskella+V:ratkiskel v3_ele ;
voivotella+V:voivottel v3_ele ;
toivoskella+V:toivoskel v3_ele ;
kiikuskella+V:kiikuskel v3_ele ;
riuđuskella+V:riuđuskel v3_ele ;
vajelella+V:vajelel v3_ele ;
käyskenellä+V:käyskentel v3_ele ;
tehenellä+V:tehentel v3_ele ;
vahvenella+V:vahventel v3_ele ;
makustella+V:makustel v3_ele ;
summastella+V:summastel v3_ele ;
aivastella+V:aivastel v3_ele ;
kieritellä+V:kierittel v3_ele ;
pällistellä+V:pällistel v3_ele ;
tirskutella+V:tirskuttel v3_ele ;
kopistella+V:kopistel v3_ele ;
piristellä+V:piristel v3_ele ;
ennustella+V:ennustel v3_ele ;
ajatella+V:ajattel v3_ele ;
lujetella+V:lujettel v3_ele ;
opetella+V:opettel v3_ele ;
lämmitellä+V:lämmittel v3_ele ;
haukoitella+V:haukoittel v3_ele ;
haukotella+V:haukottel v3_ele ;
liikutella+V:liikuttel v3_ele ;
juoputella+V:juoputtel v3_ele ;
venytellä+V:venyttel v3_ele ;
leppäätellä+V:leppäättel v3_ele ;
harhaila+V:harhail v3_ele_odd ;
kattela+V:katt2el v3_ele_odd ;
kiiluila+V:kiiluil v3_ele_odd ;
kylväilä+V:kylväil v3_ele_odd ;
käänelä+V:kääntel v3_ele_odd ;
kiussaila+V:kiussail v3_ele_odd ;
kruisaila+V:kruisail v3_ele_odd ;
laitela+V:laittel v3_ele_odd ;
sanela+V:sanel v3_ele_odd ;
vaitela+V:vait2el v3_ele_odd ;
piđelä+V:pitel v3_ele_odd ;
riiđelä+V:riitel v3_ele_odd ;
souđela+V:soutel v3_ele_odd ;
puhela+V:puhel v3_ele_odd ;
elelä+V:elel v3_ele_odd ;
keijuila+V:keijuil v3_ele_odd ;
vittuila+V:vitt2uil v3_ele_odd ;
turmela+V:turmel v3_ele_odd ;
palela+V:palel v3_ele_odd ;
tapela+V:tappel v3_ele_odd ;
nuhđela+V:nuhtel v3_ele_odd ;
kiilelä+V:kiiltel v3_ele_odd ; ! XXX vai kiillelä+V:kiiltel ?
käänelä+V:kääntel v3_ele_odd ; 
haistela+V:haistel v3_ele_odd ;
pistelä+V:pistel v3_ele_odd ;
nostela+V:nostel v3_ele_odd ;
poltela+V:polttel v3_ele_odd ;
jutela+V:juttel v3_ele_odd ;
huuđela+V:huutel v3_ele_odd ;
kirvelä+V:kirvel v3_ele_odd ;
huokkaila+V:huokk2ail v3_ele_odd ;
ihhaila+V:ihhail v3_ele_odd ;
tieraila+V:tierail v3_ele_odd ;
praamaila+V:praamail v3_ele_odd ;
korreila+V:korr2eil v3_ele_odd ;
makkoila+V:makk2oil v3_ele_odd ;
paaroila+V:paaroil v3_ele_odd ;
hengaila+V:hengail v3_ele_odd ;
kyläilä+V:kyläil v3_ele_odd ;
eppäilä+V:epp2äil v3_ele_odd ;
hyvväilä+V:hyvväil v3_ele_odd ;
nielä+V:niel v3_ele_short ;
kuola+V:kuol v3_ele_short ;
nuola+V:nuol v3_ele_short ;
vuola+V:vuol v3_ele_short ;
kuula+V:kuul v3_ele_short ;
luula+V:luul v3_ele_short ;
tuula+V:tuul v3_ele_short ;
karkaista+V:karka v3_ise ;
kiraista+V:kira v3_ise ;
halkaista+V:halka v3_ise ;
hihkaista+V:hikha v3_ise ;
polkaista+V:polka v3_ise ;
vetäistä+V:vetä v3_ise ;
sotkaista+V:sotka v3_ise ;
hitistä+V:hit v3_ise ;
kiristä+V:kir v3_ise ;
kohista+V:koh v3_ise ;
nurista+V:nur v3_ise ;
huokaista+V:huoka v3_ise ;
pyhkäistä+V:pyhkä v3_ise ;
juoksaista+V:juoksa v3_ise ;
jymistä+V:jym v3_ise ;
karjaista+V:karja v3_ise ;
kalaista+V:kala v3_ise ;
kihistä+V:kih v3_ise ;
kiljaista+V:kilja v3_ise ;
kolista+V:kol v3_ise ;
korista+V:kor v3_ise ;
kraapasta+V:kraapa v3_aise ;
sorista+V:sor v3_ise ;
tohista+V:toh v3_ise ;
kysäistä+V:kysä v3_ise ;
lakaista+V:laka v3_ise ;
lohkaista+V:lohka v3_ise ;
lorista+V:lor v3_ise ;
mumista+V:mum v3_ise ;
mutista+V:mut v3_ise ;
oikaista+V:oika v3_ise ;
porista+V:por v3_ise ;
puhkaista+V:puhka v3_ise ;
rankaista+V:ranka v3_ise ; ! XXX rankaista ??
repäistä+V:repä v3_ise ;
rypistä+V:ryp v3_ise ;
silmästä+V:silmä v3_ise ;
sylkäistä+V:sylkä v3_ise ;
täristä+V:tär v3_ise ;
ulvaista+V:ulva v3_ise ;
vilistä+V:vil v3_ise ;
väristä+V:vär v3_ise ;
